Utah statutes.
20A-1-706.   Special counsel on appeal.

(1)  If either party appeals the judgment of the trial court, the district judge, the attorney general, or the lieutenant governor who appointed special counsel for the trial court shall authorize that counsel, or some other person, to appear as special counsel in the appellate court in the matter.

(2) (a)  The special counsel authorized by this chapter shall receive a reasonable compensation for his services.

(b)  The compensation shall be audited by the lieutenant governor and paid out of the state treasury upon a voucher and upon the written statement of the officer appointing the counsel that:

(i)  the appointment has been made;

(ii)  the person appointed has faithfully performed the duties imposed upon him; and

(iii)  that the special counsel's bill is accurate and correct.

(c)  Compensation for special counsel shall be audited and paid in the same manner as other claims against the state are audited and paid.



Amended by Chapter 174, 2013 General Session

